en: Korma sauces
fr: Sauces korma

en: Worcestershire sauces
de: Worcestershiresaucen, Worcestersaucen
fi: Worcester-kastikkeet
fr: Sauces Worcestershire
hr: Worcestershire umaci
it: Salsa Worcester
ja: ウスターソース
lt: Vorčesterio padažai
nl: Worcestershire saus

en: Teriyaki sauces
af: Teriyaki-sous
ca: Salsa Teriyaki
cs: Omáčka teriyaki
da: Teriyakisovse
de: Teriyaki Soßen, Teriyakisauce
es: Salsas Teriyaki
et: Teriyaki kaste
fi: Teriyaki-kastikkeet, Teriyaki-kastike
fr: Sauces Teriyaki
gl: Mollo teriyaki
hr: Teriyaki umaci
id: Saus teriyaki
is: Teriyakisósa
it: Salse teriyaki, Salsa teriyaki
ja: 照り焼きのタレ, 照り焼きソース, テリヤキソース
jv: Saos teriyaki
lt: Teriyaki padažai
lv: Teriyaki mērce
ms: Sos teriyaki
nb: Teriyakisauser
nl: Teriyakisauzen, Teriyakisaus
nn: Teriyakisausar
pl: Sosy Teriyaki, Sos Teriyaki
pt: Molho de teriyaki
ru: Соус Тэрияки
sv: Teriyakisåser
tr: Teriyaki sosu

en: Yakitori sauces
fr: Sauces Yakitori
hr: Yakitori umaci
ja: 焼き鳥のタレ
nl: Yakitorisauzen

en: Tare sauces
fr: Tare, sauces Tare

en: Cranberry sauces
fr: Sauces à la canneberge, Sauces à la cranberry, Sauce à la canneberge, Sauce à la cranberry, Sauces cranberry
hr: Umaci od brusnice
it: Salse di mirtillo
ja: クランベリーソース
lt: Spanguolių padažai
nl: Cranberrysauzen

en: Redcurrant sauce
fr: Sauces aux groseilles, sauces à la groseille
hr: Umak od crvenog ribiza
lt: Raudonųjų serbentų padažai
pt: Molho de groselha

en: Nuoc mam sauce, Fish sauce
de: Fischsaucen
fr: Sauces Nuoc-mâm, Sauce Nuoc-mâm, Sauces Nuoc Mâm, Sauces au poisson
hr: Nuoc mam umak
ja: ヌクマム

en: Béarnaise sauce
bg: Сос Беарнез
de: Sauce Béarnaise, Béarner Sauce
es: Salsa bearnesa
fi: bernaise-kastike
fr: Sauces béarnaises, Sauce béarnaise
hr: Béarnaise umak
it: Salsa bernese
ja: ベアルネーズソース
nl: Béarnaise saus
pl: Sosy bearneńskie, Sos bearneński

en: Joppie sauces
da: Joppiesovser, Joppiesovse, Joppiesaucer
de: Joppie-Saucen
eo: Jopisaŭcoj
fa: سس یوپی
fr: Sauce joppie
nb: Joppiesauser
nl: Joppiesaus
nn: Joppiesausar
pt: Molho Joppie
sv: Joppiesåser

en: Burger sauces, Sauce burger
de: Burgersaucen
fr: Sauces burger, sauces hamburger
hr: Umaci za pljeskavice
lt: Mėsainių padažai, Padažai mėsainiams
nl: Hamburgersauzen

en: Tartare sauces
bg: Сос Тартар
fi: tartar-kastikkeet
fr: Sauces tartare
hr: Tartar umaci
it: Salsa tartara
ja: タルタルソース
nl: Tartaarsaus
pl: Sosy tatarskie, sos tatarski

en: Aiolis, Aioli sauce, Garlic and olive oil mayonnaise
de: Aioli, Allioli
es: Aliolis, Salsas alioli, Alioli, Salsa alioli
fi: Aiolit, Aiolikastikkeet
fr: Aïolis, Aiolis, sauces Aïoli, sauces Aïolis, sauce Aïoli
hr: Aiolis
it: Salsa aioli
ja: アイオリ
nl: Knoflooksauzen, Aiolisauzen
pl: Aioli, Sosy aioli
zh: 蒜味蛋黄酱

en: Béchamel sauces, Bechamel sauce
bg: Сос бешамел
de: Béchamel Saucen, Bechamel Saucen
es: Salsas bechamel, bechameles
fr: Sauces béchamel, sauce béchamel
hr: Bešamel umaci
hu: Béchamel mártások
it: Salse di besciamella
ja: ベシャメルソース
nl: Bechamelsauzen
pl: Sosy beszamelowe, Beszamel
pt: Molhos béchamel

en: Home-made Bechamel sauce
fr: Sauce béchamel maison

en: Cheese sauces
de: Käsesoßen
es: Salsas con queso
fi: juustokastikkeet
fr: Sauces au fromage, Sauce au fromage, Sauces aux fromages, Sauce aux fromages
hr: Umaci od sira
hu: Sajtosmártások, Sajtmártások
it: Salse al formaggio
lt: Sūrio padažai
nl: Kaassauzen
pl: Sosy serowe
pt: Molhos de queijo
sv: Ostsåser

en: Roquefort sauces, Blue cheese sauce
es: Salsas con Roquefort, Salsas con queso de Roquefort
fr: Sauces au roquefort, Sauce au roquefort
hr: Roquefort umaci
hu: Rokfortmártás
lt: Mėlynojo sūrio padažai
nl: Roquefortsauzen

en: Guacamoles
xx: Guacamoles
bg: Гуакамоле
fi: Guacamolet
it: Guacamole
ja: ワカモレ
lt: Gvakamolė
pl: Guacamole

en: Green sauces
de: Grüne Saucen
es: Salsas verdes
fr: Salsas verdes, sauces vertes
hr: Zeleni umaci
hu: Zöld szósz
lt: Žalieji padažai
nl: Groene sauzen

en: Hot sauces, Chili sauces, Pimented sauces, Chilli sauces
de: Scharfe Saucen, Chilisaucen, Chili Saucen, Scharfe Sauce, Piment Soßen
es: Salsas de chiles, Salsas picadas
fi: Tuliset kastikkeet
fr: Sauces chili, sauce chili, Sauces pimentées, Sauce pimentée, Sauces au piment, Sauce au piment
he: רטבים חריפים
hr: Ljuti umaci
hu: Csilimártások, CSípős mártások
it: Salse piccanti, Salse pigmentate
ja: ホットソース
lt: Aštrūs padažai, Čili padažai
nl: Chilisauzen, Pikante sauzen
pl: Pikantne sosy, Ostre sosy
sv: Chilisåser
tr: Acı sos